Illinois, session 104th, HB5460.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 5amended by changing Section 65.110 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 947/65.110)7    Sec. 65.110. Post-Master of Social Work School Social Work 8Professional Educator License scholarship.9    (a) Subject to appropriation, beginning with awards for 10the 2022-2023 academic year, the Commission shall award 11annually up to 250 Post-Master of Social Work School Social 12Work Professional Educator License scholarships, which may 13also be known as School Social Work scholarships. A qualified 14applicant to a person who:15        (1) holds a valid Illinois-licensed clinical social 16    work license or social work license or is pursuing a 17    clinical social work license or social work license;18        (2) has obtained a master's degree in social work from 19    an approved program or will obtain a master's degree in 20    social work from an approved program before enrolling in 21    the academic program that this scholarship would support;22        (3) is a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen; 23    and  HB5460 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19842 LNS 33292 b1        (4) submits an application to the Commission for such 2    scholarship and agrees to take courses to obtain an 3    Illinois Professional Educator License with an endorsement 4    in School Social Work.5    (b) If an appropriation for this Section for a given 6fiscal year is insufficient to provide scholarships to all 7qualified applicants, the Commission shall allocate the 8appropriation as follows:9        (1) first, to students who received a scholarship 10    under this Section in the prior academic year and who 11    remain eligible for a scholarship under this Section;12        (2) (blank); and13        (3) then, to new, qualified applicants in accordance 14    with this Section. 15    (c) Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be 16issued pursuant to rules adopted by the Commission.17    (d) Each scholarship shall be applied to the payment of 18tuition and mandatory fees at a State public university or at a 19private, not-for-profit institution of higher learning in this 20State that prepares students to obtain an Illinois 21Professional Educator License with an endorsement in School 22Social Work the University of Illinois, Southern Illinois 23University, Chicago State University, Eastern Illinois 24University, Governors State University, Illinois State 25University, Northeastern Illinois University, Northern 26Illinois University, and Western Illinois University. Each   HB5460 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19842 LNS 33292 b1scholarship may be applied to pay tuition and mandatory fees 2required to obtain an Illinois Professional Educator License 3with an endorsement in School Social Work. A scholarship for a 4recipient attending a private, not-for-profit institution of 5higher learning shall not exceed the maximum grant payable to 6a student enrolled in the most expensive comparable program of 7study at a public university in this State.8    (e) The Commission shall make tuition and fee payments 9directly to the qualified institution of higher learning that 10the applicant attends.11    (f) Any person who has accepted a scholarship under this 12Section must, within one year after graduation or termination 13of enrollment in a Post-Master of Social Work Professional 14Education License with an endorsement in School Social Work 15program, begin working as a school social worker at a public or 16nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or 17secondary school located in this State for at least 2 of the 5 18years immediately following that graduation or termination, 19excluding, however, from the computation of that 5-year 20period: (i) any time up to 3 years spent in the military 21service, whether such service occurs before or after the 22person graduates; (ii) the time that person is a person with a 23temporary total disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 24years, as established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified 25physician; and (iii) the time that person is seeking and 26unable to find full-time employment as a school social worker   HB5460 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19842 LNS 33292 b1at a State public or nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, 2elementary school, or secondary school.3    (g) If a recipient of a scholarship under this Section 4fails to fulfill the work obligation set forth in subsection 5(f), the Commission shall require the recipient to repay the 6amount of the scholarships received, prorated according to the 7fraction of the obligation not completed, at a rate of 8interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, reasonable 9collection fees. The Commission is authorized to establish 10rules relating to its collection activities for repayment of 11scholarships under this Section. All repayments collected 12under this Section shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller 13for deposit into this State's General Revenue Fund.14    A recipient of a scholarship under this Section is not 15considered to be in violation of the failure to fulfill the 16work obligation under subsection (f) if the recipient (i) 17enrolls on a full-time basis as a graduate student in a course 18of study related to the field of social work at a qualified 19Illinois institution of higher learning; (ii) is serving, not 20in excess of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of the 21United States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total 22disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 years, as 23established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; 24(iv) is seeking and unable to find full-time employment as a 25school social worker at an Illinois public or nonpublic 26not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or secondary   HB5460 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19842 LNS 33292 b1school that satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection (f) 2and is able to provide evidence of that fact; or (v) becomes a 3person with a permanent total disability, as established by 4the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician.5(Source: P.A. 104-437, eff. 11-21-25.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 72026.